District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-115.10

Denial, suspension, or revocation.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-221, § 11, 43 DCR 6854
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 21(a), 56 DCR 1596

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-997.10.